ubuntu.slaves.black/1/packages/xuxen-eu-spell/src/myspell/eu-ES.aff
SFX E Y 406
SFX E  t      ta          t
SFX E  t      tago          t
SFX E  t      tagoa          t
SFX E  t      tagoak          t
SFX E  t      tagoarekin          t
SFX E  t      tagoarendako          t
SFX E  t      tagoarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tagoaren          t
SFX E  t      tagoari          t
SFX E  t      tagoaz          t
SFX E  t      tagoei          t
SFX E  t      tagoek          t
SFX E  t      tagoekin          t
SFX E  t      tagoendako          t
SFX E  t      tagoentzat          t
SFX E  t      tagoez          t
SFX E  t      tagoen          t
SFX E  t      tagogatik          t
SFX E  t      tagooi          t
SFX E  t      tagook          t
SFX E  t      tagookin          t
SFX E  t      tagoontzat          t
SFX E  t      tagootaz          t
SFX E  t      tagooz          t
SFX E  t      tagoon          t
SFX E  t      tagotzat          t
SFX E  t      tagok          t
SFX E  t      tagoz          t
SFX E  t      tagorekin          t
SFX E  t      tagorendako          t
SFX E  t      tagorentzat          t
SFX E  t      tagoren          t
SFX E  t      tagori          t
SFX E  t      tagorik          t
SFX E  t      tagoan          t
SFX E  t      tagoko          t
SFX E  t      tagoraino          t
SFX E  t      tagorantz          t
SFX E  t      tagorat          t
SFX E  t      tagora          t
SFX E  t      tagotik          t
SFX E  t      tak          t
SFX E  t      tarekin          t
SFX E  t      tarekiko          t
SFX E  t      tarendako          t
SFX E  t      tarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tarentzako          t
SFX E  t      taren          t
SFX E  t      tarena          t
SFX E  t      tarenak          t
SFX E  t      tarenarekin          t
SFX E  t      tarenarendako          t
SFX E  t      tarenarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tarenari          t
SFX E  t      tarenaz          t
SFX E  t      tarenei          t
SFX E  t      tarenek          t
SFX E  t      tarenekin          t
SFX E  t      tarenendako          t
SFX E  t      tarenentzat          t
SFX E  t      tarenetaraino          t
SFX E  t      tarenetarantz          t
SFX E  t      tarenetarat          t
SFX E  t      tarenetara          t
SFX E  t      tarenetatik          t
SFX E  t      tarenetan          t
SFX E  t      tarenetarik          t
SFX E  t      tarenez          t
SFX E  t      tarengan          t
SFX E  t      tarengana          t
SFX E  t      tarenganaino          t
SFX E  t      tarenganantz          t
SFX E  t      tarengandik          t
SFX E  t      tarengatik          t
SFX E  t      tarenoi          t
SFX E  t      tarenok          t
SFX E  t      tarenokin          t
SFX E  t      tarenontzat          t
SFX E  t      tarenotaz          t
SFX E  t      tarenoz          t
SFX E  t      tareni          t
SFX E  t      tarenik          t
SFX E  t      tarenean          t
SFX E  t      tareneraino          t
SFX E  t      tarenerantz          t
SFX E  t      tarenerat          t
SFX E  t      tarenera          t
SFX E  t      tarenetik          t
SFX E  t      tari          t
SFX E  t      taz          t
SFX E  t      tagan          t
SFX E  t      tagana          t
SFX E  t      taganaino          t
SFX E  t      taganantz          t
SFX E  t      tagandik          t
SFX E  t      tagatik          t
SFX E  t      tei          t
SFX E  t      tek          t
SFX E  t      tekin          t
SFX E  t      tekiko          t
SFX E  t      tendako          t
SFX E  t      tentzat          t
SFX E  t      tentzako          t
SFX E  t      tetako          t
SFX E  t      tetakoa          t
SFX E  t      tetakoago          t
SFX E  t      tetakoak          t
SFX E  t      tetakoarekin          t
SFX E  t      tetakoarendako          t
SFX E  t      tetakoarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tetakoari          t
SFX E  t      tetakoaz          t
SFX E  t      tetakoegi          t
SFX E  t      tetakoei          t
SFX E  t      tetakoek          t
SFX E  t      tetakoekin          t
SFX E  t      tetakoendako          t
SFX E  t      tetakoentzat          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetaraino          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetarantz          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetarat          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetara          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetatik          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetan          t
SFX E  t      tetakoetarik          t
SFX E  t      tetakoez          t
SFX E  t      tetakogatik          t
SFX E  t      tetakooi          t
SFX E  t      tetakook          t
SFX E  t      tetakookin          t
SFX E  t      tetakoontzat          t
SFX E  t      tetakootaz          t
SFX E  t      tetakooz          t
SFX E  t      tetakotzat          t
SFX E  t      tetakok          t
SFX E  t      tetakotaraino          t
SFX E  t      tetakotarantz          t
SFX E  t      tetakotarat          t
SFX E  t      tetakotara          t
SFX E  t      tetakotatik          t
SFX E  t      tetakotan          t
SFX E  t      tetakotarik          t
SFX E  t      tetakoz          t
SFX E  t      tetakorekin          t
SFX E  t      tetakorendako          t
SFX E  t      tetakorentzat          t
SFX E  t      tetakori          t
SFX E  t      tetakorik          t
SFX E  t      tetakoan          t
SFX E  t      tetakoraino          t
SFX E  t      tetakorantz          t
SFX E  t      tetakorat          t
SFX E  t      tetakora          t
SFX E  t      tetakotik          t
SFX E  t      tetaraino          t
SFX E  t      tetarainoko          t
SFX E  t      tetarantz          t
SFX E  t      tetarantzago          t
SFX E  t      tetarantzegi          t
SFX E  t      tetaranzko          t
SFX E  t      tetarat          t
SFX E  t      tetarako          t
SFX E  t      tetara          t
SFX E  t      tetarago          t
SFX E  t      tetatik          t
SFX E  t      tetatiko          t
SFX E  t      tetan          t
SFX E  t      tetarik          t
SFX E  t      tetariko          t
SFX E  t      tez          t
SFX E  t      ten          t
SFX E  t      tena          t
SFX E  t      tenak          t
SFX E  t      tenarekin          t
SFX E  t      tenarendako          t
SFX E  t      tenarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tenari          t
SFX E  t      tenaz          t
SFX E  t      tenei          t
SFX E  t      tenek          t
SFX E  t      tenekin          t
SFX E  t      tenendako          t
SFX E  t      tenentzat          t
SFX E  t      tenetaraino          t
SFX E  t      tenetarantz          t
SFX E  t      tenetarat          t
SFX E  t      tenetara          t
SFX E  t      tenetatik          t
SFX E  t      tenetan          t
SFX E  t      tenetarik          t
SFX E  t      tenez          t
SFX E  t      tengan          t
SFX E  t      tengana          t
SFX E  t      tenganaino          t
SFX E  t      tenganantz          t
SFX E  t      tengandik          t
SFX E  t      tengatik          t
SFX E  t      tenoi          t
SFX E  t      tenok          t
SFX E  t      tenokin          t
SFX E  t      tenontzat          t
SFX E  t      tenotaz          t
SFX E  t      tenoz          t
SFX E  t      teni          t
SFX E  t      tenik          t
SFX E  t      tenean          t
SFX E  t      teneraino          t
SFX E  t      tenerantz          t
SFX E  t      tenerat          t
SFX E  t      tenera          t
SFX E  t      tenetik          t
SFX E  t      tgatik          t
SFX E  t      tgatiko          t
SFX E  t      toi          t
SFX E  t      tok          t
SFX E  t      tokin          t
SFX E  t      tokiko          t
SFX E  t      tontzat          t
SFX E  t      tontzako          t
SFX E  t      totaz          t
SFX E  t      totako          t
SFX E  t      totaraino          t
SFX E  t      totarantz          t
SFX E  t      totarat          t
SFX E  t      totara          t
SFX E  t      totatik          t
SFX E  t      totan          t
SFX E  t      totarik          t
SFX E  t      toz          t
SFX E  t      ton          t
SFX E  t      tona          t
SFX E  t      tonak          t
SFX E  t      tonarekin          t
SFX E  t      tonarendako          t
SFX E  t      tonarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tonari          t
SFX E  t      tonaz          t
SFX E  t      tonei          t
SFX E  t      tonek          t
SFX E  t      tonekin          t
SFX E  t      tonendako          t
SFX E  t      tonentzat          t
SFX E  t      tonez          t
SFX E  t      tongan          t
SFX E  t      tongana          t
SFX E  t      tonganaino          t
SFX E  t      tonganantz          t
SFX E  t      tongandik          t
SFX E  t      tongatik          t
SFX E  t      tonoi          t
SFX E  t      tonok          t
SFX E  t      tonokin          t
SFX E  t      tonontzat          t
SFX E  t      tonotaz          t
SFX E  t      tonoz          t
SFX E  t      toni          t
SFX E  t      tonik          t
SFX E  t      tonean          t
SFX E  t      toneraino          t
SFX E  t      tonerantz          t
SFX E  t      tonerat          t
SFX E  t      tonera          t
SFX E  t      tonetik          t
SFX E  t      teko          t
SFX E  t      tekoa          t
SFX E  t      tekoak          t
SFX E  t      tekoarekin          t
SFX E  t      tekoarendako          t
SFX E  t      tekoarentzat          t
SFX E  t      tekoari          t
SFX E  t      tekoaz          t
SFX E  t      tekoei          t
SFX E  t      tekoek          t
SFX E  t      tekoekin          t
SFX E  t      tekoendako          t
SFX E  t      tekoentzat          t
SFX E  t      tekoetaraino          t
SFX E  t      tekoetarantz          t
SFX E  t      tekoetarat          t
SFX E  t      tekoetara          t
SFX E  t      tekoetatik          t
SFX E  t      tekoetan          t
SFX E  t      tekoetarik          t
SFX E  t      tekoez          t
SFX E  t      tekogatik          t
SFX E  t      tekooi          t
SFX E  t      tekook          t
SFX E  t      tekookin          t
SFX E  t      tekoontzat          t
SFX E  t      tekootaz          t
SFX E  t      tekooz          t
SFX E  t      tekotzat          t
SFX E  t      tekok          t
SFX E  t      tekotaraino          t
SFX E  t      tekotarantz          t
SFX E  t      tekotarat          t
SFX E  t      tekotara          t
SFX E  t      tekotatik          t
SFX E  t      tekotan          t
SFX E  t      tekotarik          t
SFX E  t      tekoz          t
SFX E  t      tekorekin          t
SFX E  t      tekorendako          t
SFX E  t      tekorentzat          t
SFX E  t      tekori          t
SFX E  t      tekorik          t
SFX E  t      tekoan          t
SFX E  t      tekoraino          t
SFX E  t      tekorantz          t
SFX E  t      tekorat          t
SFX E  t      tekora          t
SFX E  t      tekotik          t
SFX E  t      tezko          t
SFX E  t      tegatik          t
SFX E  t      ti          t
SFX E  t      tik          t
SFX E  t      tean          t
SFX E  t      tekoago          t
SFX E  t      tekoegi          t
SFX E  t      teraino          t
SFX E  t      terainoko          t
SFX E  t      terantz          t
SFX E  t      terantzago          t
SFX E  t      terantzegi          t
SFX E  t      teranzko          t
SFX E  t      terat          t
SFX E  t      terako          t
SFX E  t      tera          t
SFX E  t      terago          t
SFX E  t      tetik          t
SFX E  t      tetiko          t
SFX E  t      txo          t
SFX E  t      txoa          t
SFX E  t      txoak          t
SFX E  t      txoarekin          t
SFX E  t      txoarendako          t
SFX E  t      txoarentzat          t
SFX E  t      txoaren          t
SFX E  t      txoari          t
SFX E  t      txoaz          t
SFX E  t      txoei          t
SFX E  t      txoek          t
SFX E  t      txoekin          t
SFX E  t      txoendako          t
SFX E  t      txoentzat          t
SFX E  t      txoez          t
SFX E  t      txoen          t
SFX E  t      txogatik          t
SFX E  t      txooi          t
SFX E  t      txook          t
SFX E  t      txookin          t
SFX E  t      txoontzat          t
SFX E  t      txootaz          t
SFX E  t      txooz          t
